Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-137
District taxes; disposition.

All such taxes collected or received for the district bond and general funds, either in money, interest coupons or warrants on the general fund, by the treasurer of any county other than the one in which the district was originally organized shall be remitted by him to the treasurer of the county in which the district was originally organized; such remittance to be made on the fifth day of every month. All such taxes collected or received for the general fund of a district by the treasurer of the county in which the district was originally organized shall be paid to the treasurer of such irrigation district, upon an order signed by the president and secretary of such district, and all warrants received in payment of general fund taxes may be turned over, as so much money, to the district treasurer on such orders.

Laws 1897, c. 86, § 4, p. 363;

Laws 1899, c. 78, § 1, p. 333;

Laws 1901, c. 77, § 1, p. 469;

Laws 1913, c. 142, § 3, p. 347;

R.S.1913, § 3475;

Laws 1915, c. 68, § 1, p. 169;

Laws 1915, c. 69, § 5, p. 177;

Laws 1919, c. 110, § 1, p. 271;

C.S.1922, § 2875;

C.S.1929, § 46-120;

R.S.1943, § 46-137.

This section provides for the disposition of the taxes raised in an irrigation district. Loup County v. Rumbaugh, 151 Neb. 563, 38 N.W.2d 745 (1949).